Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 4 Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act
8-4-224. Appeals — Parties.

The appellant, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, and the owner or operator of the business, industry, municipality, or thing involved, if applicable, shall in all cases be the original parties to an appeal.

The state, through the Attorney General or any other person affected, may become a party by intervention as in a civil action, upon showing cause therefor.

The Attorney General shall represent the commission, if requested, upon all these appeals, unless he or she appeals or intervenes in behalf of the state.

No bond or deposit for costs shall be required of the state or of the commission upon any such appeal or upon any subsequent appeal to the Supreme Court or other court proceedings pertaining to the matter.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 2013, No. 1021, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted “and the owner or operator of the business, industry, municipality, or thing involved, if applicable” in (a)(1).

8-4-225. Appeals — Venue.

Except as provided in § 8-4-223(d), upon written consent of the parties or for cause shown after hearing upon notice to all parties, the venue of an appeal may be changed by order of the circuit court to the circuit court of a county in which the order, rule, or decision appealed from would take effect.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 2013, No. 1021, § 5; 2019, No. 315, § 478.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added the exception and inserted “circuit” preceding the first occurrence of “court”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “regulation” following “rule”.

8-4-226. Appeal — Response by commission and record.

Within thirty (30) days after service of the notice of appeal on the Secretary of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall file with the clerk of the circuit court having jurisdiction of the appeal a response to the notice of appeal and the record upon which the final order, rule, or other final determination complained of was entered.

The thirty-day period for filing a response to the notice of appeal and the record by the commission may be extended by the court for cause shown for not more than an additional sixty (60) days.

The record shall consist of:

A copy of any application or petition, all pleadings, or other material paper whereon the action of the commission appealed from was based;

A statement of any findings of fact, rulings, or conclusions of law made by the commission;

A copy of the final order, rule, or other final decision appealed from; and

All testimony, exhibits, and other evidence submitted to the commission in the case.

The parties to the appeal may stipulate that only a specified portion of the record shall be filed with the circuit court.

A response to the notice of appeal filed by the commission shall consist of any statements, admissions, or denials upon the questions of law or fact raised in the notice of appeal as the commission may deem pertinent.

Within the time allowed for making and filing the response, a copy of the response shall be mailed to or served upon the appellant or the appellant's attorney.

The allegations or new matter in the response shall be deemed to be denied by the appellant unless expressly admitted, and no further pleadings shall be interposed.

Otherwise, the allegations of the notice of appeal and response shall have like effect as the pleadings in a civil action and shall be subject to like proceedings, so far as applicable.

With respect to an appeal that is before the Court of Appeals as the result of a motion to transfer an appeal under § 8-4-223(d), the requirements applicable to the commission's response and the record shall be determined under the Rules of Appellate Procedure — Civil.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; 1965, No. 183, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 1997, No. 896, § 2; 1997, No. 1219, § 5; 2013, No. 1021, § 6; 2019, No. 315, §§ 479, 480.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (d).

The 2019 amendment deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a)(1) and (a)(3)(A)(iii).

8-4-227. Appeal — Review by circuit court.

The appeal shall be heard and determined by the circuit court upon the issues raised by the notice of appeal and response according to the rules relating to the trial of civil actions, so far as applicable.

If, before the date set for the hearing, application is made to the circuit court for leave to present additional evidence and the circuit court finds that the evidence is material and that there were good reasons for failure to present it in the proceeding before the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, then the circuit court may order that the additional evidence be taken before the commission upon such conditions as may be just. The commission may modify its findings and decision by reason of the additional evidence and shall file that evidence and any modifications, new findings, or decisions with the reviewing circuit court.

The review shall be conducted by the circuit court without a jury and shall be confined to the record.

However, in cases of alleged irregularities in procedure before the commission that are not shown in the record, testimony may be taken before the circuit court.

The circuit court shall, upon request, hear oral argument and receive written briefs.

The circuit court may affirm the decision of the commission or vacate or suspend the decision, in whole or part, and remand the case to the commission for further action in conformity with the decision of the circuit court if the action of the commission is:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

In excess of the commission's statutory authority;

Made upon unlawful procedure;

Affected by other error of law;

Not supported by substantial evidence of record; or

Arbitrary, capricious, or characterized by abuse of discretion.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; 1985, No. 284, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 1995, No. 895, § 3; 1997, No. 896, § 3; 1997, No. 1219, § 5; 2013, No. 1021, § 7.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted “circuit” before “court” throughout the section and added the (c)(1)(A) and (B) designations.

8-4-228. Appeal — Stay of proceedings.

The taking effect of any action of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall not be stayed by an appeal except by order of the court for cause shown by the appellant.

The granting of a stay may be conditioned upon the furnishing by the appellant of such reasonable security for costs as the court may direct.

A stay may be vacated on application of the commission or any other party after hearing upon notice to the appellant and to such other parties as the court may direct.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906.

8-4-229. Appeals, proceedings, etc. — Presumptions.

In any appeal or other proceeding involving any order, rule, or other decision of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, the action of the commission shall be prima facie evidence reasonable and valid, and it shall be presumed that all requirements of the law pertaining to the taking thereof have been complied with.

All findings of fact made by the commission shall be prima facie evidence of the matters therein stated.

The burden of proving the contrary of any provision of this section shall rest upon the appellant or other party questioning the action of the commission.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 481.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a).

8-4-230. Temporary variances and interim authority.

Unless otherwise expressly prohibited by federal law, the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality may, for compelling reasons and good cause shown, grant:

A temporary variance from the requirements of a permit issued by the Division of Environmental Quality; or

Interim authority to construct or operate during the application review and permit issuance process.

Such temporary variances or interim authority shall not exceed a period of ninety (90) days, except when a longer period is justified by circumstances beyond the applicant's control. The division may grant a request for an extension of a temporary variance or interim authority at any time prior to the expiration date.

The division may require an initial processing fee of two hundred dollars ($200) for a request for a temporary variance or an interim authority request. This fee shall not be required for requests for an extension of any temporary variance or interim authority.

In considering a request for a temporary variance under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section, the director shall consider:

The environmental and public health effects of the temporary variance;

Any economic advantage obtained by the party requesting the temporary variance over other similarly situated facilities that are operating in accordance with similar permit conditions and that have not requested a temporary variance; and

Whether strict compliance would result in the substantial curtailment or closing down of an existing or proposed business, plant, or operation.

In addition, the director may take into account the following factors in considering a request under subdivision (a)(1) of this section:

Whether strict compliance with permit terms is inappropriate because of conditions beyond the control of the person requesting the temporary variance;

Whether the temporary variance request is prompted by recurrent or avoidable compliance problems;

Whether a review of the operational history of the requesting facility reveals relevant information; and

Whether the public interest will be served by a temporary variance.

When considering any request for interim authority during the application review and permit issuance process pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, the director may take into account the following factors in addition to the applicable factors of subsection (b) of this section:

Whether the applicable permitting applications were timely and completely submitted;

Whether there has been a delay in the final permitting action caused by conditions beyond the control of the person requesting the interim authority;

Whether contractual or other business obligations will become due before a proper permit can be issued; and

Whether the public interest will be served by construction or operation during the application review and permit issuance process.

After a review of the applicable factors, the director may:

Grant an unconditional variance or interim authority to the requesting party;

Grant a conditional temporary variance or interim authority to the requesting party. Such conditions shall be designed to be protective of human health and the environment and must be clearly stated or referenced in the temporary variance or interim authority document; or

Deny the request for a temporary variance or interim authority. If a denial is issued, the director shall clearly state the reason or reasons for the denial in a written response to the applicant.

The director's decision to grant or deny a temporary variance or interim authority to construct or operate shall be issued within ten (10) days of receipt of the request for the temporary variance or interim authority and shall be publicly noticed in a newspaper of general circulation in the state within five (5) business days of the director's decision. The applicant shall be responsible for the expense of the publication of a decision to grant a temporary variance or interim authority. The division shall be responsible for the expense of the publication of a decision to deny a temporary variance or interim authority.

A person may object to the director's decision within ten (10) business days of the notice.

A temporary variance or interim authority granted by the director is contingent upon the right of any person to object.

An action taken by the applicant in reliance upon the grant of a temporary variance or interim authority during the application review and permit issuance process is strictly at the applicant's own risk, and an action or expenditure by the applicant during this period does not accrue equities in the applicant's favor.

The public notice requirement under this section shall not apply to the director's decision to grant an extension of a temporary variance or interim authority.

The director may also for compelling reasons or good cause shown revoke or modify the conditions of a temporary variance or interim authority previously granted.

An applicant that is denied a temporary variance or interim authority or that has a temporary variance or interim authority revoked or a third party that submitted timely objections during the application review and permit issuance process described in subsection (e) of this section may appeal the director's final decision to the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission upon written request made within ten (10) days after notice of the director's decision.

Unless otherwise agreed to by the party requesting review of the director's decision, an appeal under subdivision (g)(1) of this section shall be considered by the commission at the next regularly scheduled commission meeting following submission of the written request.

However:

The decision of the director shall remain in effect during the appeal;

The commission's review shall be completed as expeditiously as possible; and

A final decision shall be issued by the commission within thirty (30) days unless all parties agree to extend the review time.

The commission may affirm, amend, modify, or revoke the director's final decision.

An affirmation of the director's final decision shall be based on the determination by the commission that the:

Director adequately considered all relevant and applicable factors under subsections (b) and (c) of this section in arriving at the final decision; and

Public interest will be served by the affirmation of the director's final decision.

An amendment, modification, or revocation of the director's final decision shall be based on a determination by the commission that the:

Director's final decision was unduly burdensome, impractical, or unreasonable given the circumstances;

Director failed to adequately consider the applicable factors under subsections (b) and (c) of this section; or

Public interest will be served by the amendment, modification, or revocation of the director's final decision.

A party that submits an objection to the director's decision under subdivision (e)(2) of this section and is aggrieved by a commission decision on a request for a temporary variance or interim authority may appeal as provided by applicable law.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 943, § 1; 1999, No. 147, § 1; 2013, No. 1021, §§ 8-10; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2509, 2510.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “expressly prohibited by federal law” for “prohibited by preemptive federal law” in (a)(1); added (b)(1)(C); added “in considering a request under subdivision (a)(1) of this section” to the end of the introductory paragraph in (b)(2); deleted former (b)(2)(B); in (e)(1), inserted “be issued within ten (10) days of receipt of the request for the temporary variance or interim authority and shall” and substituted “in a newspaper of general circulation in the state within five (5) business days” for “within ten (10) business days”; added the ending to (g)(1), beginning with “to the Arkansas Pollution Control”; rewrote (g)(2)(A); substituted “thirty (30) days” for “sixty (60) days” in (g)(2)(B)(iii); added (g)(2)(C); and inserted “that submits an objection to the director's decision under subdivision (e)(2) of this section and is” in (h).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a)(1) and in (a)(1)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(2), (a)(3), and (e)(1).

8-4-231. Effectiveness of regulations, rules, or orders.

This act shall not be construed as impairing the continued effectiveness of any regulations, rules, or orders promulgated or issued by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission prior to March 31, 1999. Nor shall this act be construed as extinguishing or otherwise affecting the unexpired terms of any current members of the commission.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 10; 2019, No. 315, § 482.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “rules” in the section heading and in the section.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1997, No. 1219, is codified primarily in §§ 8-4-201 et seq., 8-4-301 et seq., and 8-5-201 et seq. For the full disposition of Acts 1997, No. 1219, see Tables Volume B.

8-4-232. Nutrient water quality trading programs — Definition.

As used in this section, “nutrient” means a substance assimilated by an organism that promotes growth and replacement of cellular constituents, including without limitation nitrogen, phosphorus, and carbon.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may adopt rules that specify requirements, standards, and procedures governing the establishment and implementation of nutrient water quality trading programs, including without limitation program scope, eligibility, and threshold treatment requirements.

The nutrient water quality trading programs may include without limitation the following:

The establishment and regulation of nutrient water quality trading exchanges;

The establishment and regulation of nutrient water quality compliance associations;

The authorization and regulation of nutrient water quality trading credits;

The authorization and regulation of nutrient water quality offsets; and

The establishment of a schedule of user fees to be collected by the Division of Environmental Quality from persons or entities applying for approval of, generating, or utilizing nutrient water quality trades or offsets to comply with permit limits.

The user fees shall be based on a record calculating the reasonable costs to the division of evaluating, implementing, and enforcing each nutrient water quality trading, credit, or offset program.

Under rules adopted by the commission under subsection (b) of this section, the division may:

Include terms and conditions in any appropriate permit that allow the eligible permit holder to use water quality trading arrangements such as water quality trading credits and water quality offsets as a means for complying with appropriate nutrient effluent limitations or conditions contained in the permit; and

Issue permits to eligible compliance associations as a means for multiple eligible permit holders to collectively satisfy their aggregate permit limits for one (1) or more appropriate nutrient water quality parameters.

A nutrient water quality trading program or arrangement established under this section shall provide that a decision to participate in the nutrient water quality trading program or arrangement is a matter of voluntary choice on the part of each participant in the nutrient water quality trading program or arrangement.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 335, § 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 483, 484; 2019, No. 668, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2511, 2512.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015, No. 335, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent. The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Water quality trading is a market-based approach to achieving water quality goals that can provide greater efficiency and cost savings by allowing one (1) source to meet its regulatory obligations by using pollutant reductions created by another source that has lower pollution control costs;

“(2)

Experience in other states has demonstrated that nutrient water quality trading programs, including the use of credits, offsets, and compliance associations, can result in quicker and more efficient achievement of water quality protection goals; and

“(3)

Nutrient water quality trading should be encouraged wherever appropriate and facilitated by the development of applicable regulations and permit terms.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 668 inserted “applying for approval of, generating, or” in (b)(2)(E)(i); and inserted “evaluating” in (b)(2)(E)(ii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(2)(E)(i); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(2)(E)(ii) and the introductory language of (c).

8-4-233. Nutrient Water Quality Trading Advisory Panel — Creation — Members — Duties.

The Nutrient Water Quality Trading Advisory Panel is created, consisting of nine (9) members as follows:

One (1) member appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

One (1) member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and

Seven (7) members appointed by the Governor as follows:

One (1) member to represent agricultural interests;

One (1) member to represent forestry interests;

One (1) member to represent municipal wastewater treatment facility interests;

One (1) member to represent public drinking water supply interests;

One (1) member to represent the interests of industries that hold point source wastewater discharge permits; and

Two (2) members to represent the interests of environmental organizations regarding water quality.

A member shall serve a term of two (2) years or until a successor is appointed.

A member may serve successive terms without limitation.

If a vacancy occurs, the officer who made the original appointment for that position shall appoint a person who represents the same constituency as the member being replaced.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Meetings may be conducted with members participating via telephonic or other electronic conferencing methods.

The panel shall elect a chair and vice chair.

The panel may adopt rules relating to the conduct of its meetings.

Members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for expenses in accordance with § 25-16-902, if funds are available.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall provide meeting space and administrative services for the panel.

The panel may:

Advise the division and the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission regarding the desirability, design, and operation of nutrient water quality trading programs; and

Advise the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission regarding the promulgation of rules involving nutrient water quality trading programs.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall not initiate a rulemaking proceeding to adopt a rule that authorizes or governs nutrient water quality trading unless:

The proposed rule has been recommended by the panel; or

A copy of the proposed rule has been delivered to the panel at least sixty (60) calendar days before the date the request to initiate the rulemaking is filed with the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

Subsection (h) of this section does not limit the authority of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission to:

Alter a proposed rule at any time during the rulemaking proceeding; or

Initiate a rulemaking proceeding if:

The members of the panel have not been appointed; or

The panel lacks an actively serving quorum.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 335, § 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 485, 486; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2513, 2514.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015, No. 335, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent. The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Water quality trading is a market-based approach to achieving water quality goals that can provide greater efficiency and cost savings by allowing one (1) source to meet its regulatory obligations by using pollutant reductions created by another source that has lower pollution control costs;

“(2)

Experience in other states has demonstrated that nutrient water quality trading programs, including the use of credits, offsets, and compliance associations, can result in quicker and more efficient achievement of water quality protection goals; and

“(3)

Nutrient water quality trading should be encouraged wherever appropriate and facilitated by the development of applicable regulations and permit terms.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (g)(2); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” throughout (h), and in (i)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (f); and substituted “division” for “department” in (g)(1).

8-4-234. Short-term activity authorization.

The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality may authorize short-term activities that have potential to affect compliance with Arkansas water quality standards if:

The short-term activity is essential to the protection or promotion of the public interest; and

No permanent or long-term impairment of beneficial uses is likely to result from the short-term activity.

Short-term activities eligible for authorization include without limitation:

Wastewater treatment facility maintenance;

Fish eradication projects;

Mosquito abatement projects;

Algae and weed control projects;

Dredge and fill projects;

Construction activities; or

Activities that result in overall enhancement or maintenance of beneficial uses.

The Division of Environmental Quality may collect a short-term activity authorization fee.

The short-term activity authorization fee shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200) for each stream crossing, in-stream activity, or other eligible activity under subdivision (a)(2) of this section at each site identified in the application.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may establish a fee schedule for short-term activity authorization fees imposed on a state agency, board, or commission or municipality, city, or county for a short-term activity not covered under subsection (c) of this section to include without limitation:

Routine maintenance; or

Road construction.

The division shall enter into an agreement with a state agency, board, or commission or municipality, city, or county that creates an alternative payment structure in lieu of short-term activity authorization fees authorized under subdivision (b)(2) of this section.

An agreement entered into under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section shall include:

A provision regarding waiver of short-term activity authorization fees under this section; and

A process under which the division provides notice to the state agency, board, or commission or municipality, city, or county of planned actions under this section that affect the state agency, board, or commission or municipality, city, or county.

The division shall waive twenty-five percent (25%) of a short-term activity authorization fee assessed under this section to a state agency, board, or commission or municipality, city, or county in a fiscal year.

At the request of a state agency, board, or commission or municipality, city, or county, the director shall waive the short-term activity authorization fee under subsection (b) of this section to facilitate emergency activity limited to the following:

Storm debris removal necessary to prevent damage to a bridge, road, or other structure;

Emergency bridge maintenance or repair; or

Emergency road maintenance or repair.

A state agency, board, or commission or municipality, city, or county that submits a request for a waiver of the short-term activity authorization fee under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall provide the division:

Notice by phone or email before commencing any in-stream activity;

A written request for waiver of the short-term activity authorization fee that includes:

A request that the short-term activity fee be waived; and

A statement that describes the emergency conditions that require the short-term activity; and

Written notice of completion, including detailed information concerning all in-stream activity.

The director shall determine the necessary conditions for the authorization under this section.

This section does not supersede existing state or federal permitting processes or requirements.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may promulgate rules for the administration of this section.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 585, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 487; 2019, No. 693, § 7; 2019, No. 910, §§
2515-2520.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (f).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693, in (b)(1), deleted “processing fee for a” preceding “short-term” and added “fee”; and inserted “short-term activity authorization” in (4)(A), (4)(B)(i), and (5).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a) and in (b)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (b) and in the introductory language of (c)(2).

Subchapter 3
— Air Pollution

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7, provided in part that Acts 1949, No. 472 was amended by adding a new “Part 2, Air Pollution” (subchapter 3 of this chapter).

Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. With Act 1230 of 1991, the General Assembly sought to delineate the respective responsibilities of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control & Ecology. Confusion on these issues in the public's perception continues, however, primarily because of the similarity in the names of these entities. The purpose of this Act is to achieve the legislative intent of Act 1230 of 1991 and to definitively assign the executive, adjudicatory, and rulemaking roles for the State's regulatory functions concerning protection of the environment.”

Cross References.

Permit fees for air, water, and solid waste pollution control activities, § 8-1-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1949, No. 472, § 12: approved Mar. 29, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the pollution of the waters and the streams in the State of Arkansas from sewage, industrial waste, garbage, municipal refuse, and many other sources has created and is creating a hazard and danger to the public health of the people of the State of Arkansas, and is endangering the fish and other wildlife of the State of Arkansas; and, whereas, improper and inadequate sewer systems and disposal plants and treatment works cannot be adequately inspected, checked, and supervised under existing laws; and, whereas, present laws to prevent the pollution of the streams and to protect the health and general welfare of the people are inadequate and there are overlapping authorities as to control and regulations; and whereas, the continuance of such conditions presents an immediate and continuing threat and hazard to the public peace, health, and safety, therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1965, No. 183, § 8: Mar. 10, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the pollution of the air resources of the State of Arkansas by air contaminants can create serious hazards to the public health and welfare of the people; and, whereas, it is the public policy of the state to maintain such a reasonable degree of purity of the air to the end that the least possible injury shall be done to human, plant, or animal life or to property, and to maintain public enjoyment of the state's natural resources, consistent with the economic and industrial well-being of the state; and, whereas, existing laws to prevent, control, and abate air pollution are inadequate to protect the health and general welfare of the people; now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 943, § 6: Apr. 5, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that, in order to avoid the needless disruption of business in this state, the director of the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology should be given authority to grant temporary variances and interim authority to construct or operate regulated activities. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 179, § 38: Feb. 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and in its place established the House Interim Committee and Senate Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1302, § 6: Apr. 18, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current policy of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality of implementing the National Ambient Air Quality Standards through stationary source permitting is more stringent than the practices of other states in the region, thereby discouraging the expenditure of capital improvement funds for economic development and environmental improvement projects within the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary to align the policies for implementation of National Ambient Air Quality Standards and the development of state implementation plans to those of the federal government and other states. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-4-301. Legislative intent.

In the interest of the public health and welfare of the people, it is declared to be the public policy of the State of Arkansas to maintain such a reasonable degree of purity of the air resources of the state to the end that the least possible injury should be done to human, plant, or animal life or to property and to maintain public enjoyment of the state's natural resources, consistent with the economic and industrial well-being of the state.

The program for the control of air pollution under this chapter shall be undertaken in a progressive manner, and each of its successive objectives shall be sought to be accomplished by a maximum of cooperation and conciliation among all the parties concerned.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 2], § 1, as added by Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1931.

8-4-302. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to safeguard the air resources of the state by controlling or abating air pollution that exists when this subchapter takes effect and preventing new air pollution under a program which shall be consistent with the declaration of policy stated in § 8-4-301 and with this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 2], § 2, as added by Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1932.